src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/V-A-I-itapoo_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  +ero+:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.+fst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.+fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - itapoo - ok : # -m animate intransitive verb, go AEW NA2
     PS/yaak+itapoo+VAI+Ind+1Sg: nitaakitapoo
     PS/yaak+itapoo+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [ nitaakitapoohpinnaan, nitaakitapoohpinnaana ]
     PS/yaak+itapoo+VAI+Ind+2Sg+Interr: kitaakitapoohpa
     PS/yaak+PS/it+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: aakitsitapoowa
     PS/yaak+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: aakitapoowa
     PS/yaak+itapoo+VAI+Ind+21Pl: [ aakitapaoo'pa, aakitapaoo'p ]
     PS/a+itapoo+VAI+Ind+2Sg+Interr: kitaitapoohpa
     itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: itapoowa
     itapoo+VAI+Ind+21Pl: [ itapaoo'pa, itapaoo'p ]
     PS/ii+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: iitapoowa
     PS/a+PS/sstsim+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: aisstsimitapoowa
     PS/yaak+PS/matoom+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: aakotoomitapoowa
     PS/maat+PS/kaak+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: maatsikakitapoowa
     PS/yaak+PS/otam+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: aakotamitapoowa
     PS/aahksikkam+PS/a'p+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: aahksikkama'pitapoowa
     PS/aahk+PS/oht+itapoo+VAI+Ind+2Sg: kaahkohtsitapoo
     PS/aahk+itapoo+VAI+Ind+2Sg: kaahkitapoo
     PS/yaak+PS/ikipp+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: aaksikippitapoowa
     PS/ii+PS/ikipp+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: [ kayippitapoowa, iikippitapoowa ]
     itapoo+VAI+Ind+2Sg+Interr: kitsitapoohpa
     PS/aahk+itapoo+VAI+Ind+2Sg+Interr: kaahkitapoohpa
     PS/stam+itapoo+VAI+Imp+2Sg: stamitapoot
     PS/matt+PS/it+itapoo+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [ nimattsitsitapoohpinnaana, nimattsitsitapoohpinnaan ]
     PS/maat+PS/anow+PS/a+itapoo+VAI+Ind+2Sg+Interr: kimaatanowaitapoohpa
     PS/itam+PS/it+PS/a+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: itamitaitapoowa
     PS/a+PS/ssk+PS/yaahs+itapoo+VAI+Ind+3Sg: aisskaahsitapoowa
     itapoo+VAI+Imp+2Sg: [ istapoot, stapoot ]
